California statutes. Public Contract Code
The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Tehama County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, as provided for in Chapter 1280 of the Statutes of 1957.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21331.

(a) All contracts for the construction of any unit of work, except as provided in this article, estimated to cost in excess of three thousand five hundred dollars ($3,500) shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder in the manner provided in this article. The board shall advertise by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation published in the district inviting sealed proposals for the construction of the work before any contract shall be made, and may let by contract separately any part of the work. The board shall require the successful bidder to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of
 the contract and upon the payment of all claims for labor and material, the bonds to contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code, and to be subject to the provisions of that title. The board shall also have the right to reject any bid, in which case the board may advertise for new bids.

(b) In the event no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement, where the estimated cost of the work does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or where the work consists of emergency work, the board of directors, by unanimous vote of all members present, may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by force account. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(c) The district may purchase
 in the open market, without advertisement for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work either under contract or by force account; provided, however, that materials and supplies for use in any new construction work or improvement, except work referred to in subdivision (b), may not be purchased if the cost exceeds five thousand dollars ($5,000), without advertising for bids and awarding the contract to the lowest responsible bidder.

(d) The provisions of this section have no application to a contract entered into with the United States under the authority of Section 3 of Chapter 1280 of the Statutes of 1957, or to a contract authorized by a vote of the electorate of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 78.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 99. Shasta County Water Agency [21340. - 21341.]

21340.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Shasta County Water Agency, as provided for in Chapter 1512 of the Statutes of 1957.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21341.

(a) All contracts for the construction of any unit of work, except as provided in this article, estimated to cost in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder. The board shall advertise by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation published by the agency inviting sealed proposals for the construction of the work before any contract is made, and may let by contract separately any part of the work. The board shall require the successful bidder to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of the claims for labor and
 material, the bonds to contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code, and to be subject to the provisions of that title. The board shall also have the right to reject any bid, in which case the board may advertise for new bids. In the event no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement or where the estimated cost of the work does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or where the work consists of emergency work, the board, by unanimous vote of all members present, may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by force account. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050). The agency may purchase in the open market, without advertisement for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work either under contract or by force account.

(b) The
 provisions of this section have no application to a contract entered into with the United States under the authority of Section 59 of Chapter 1512 of the Statutes of 1957, or to a contract authorized by a vote of the electorate of the agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 79.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 100. Yuba County Water Agency [21350. - 21351.]

21350.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Yuba County Water Agency, as provided for in Chapter 788 of the Statutes of 1959.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21351.

All contracts for any improvement or unit of work, when the cost according to the estimate of the engineer will exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders as provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit, or divided into severable parts. The board shall advertise for bids by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and published by the agency, inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work. The call for bids shall state whether the work shall be performed in one unit or divided into parts. The work may be let under a
 single contract or several contracts, as stated in the call. The board shall require the successful bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material. The bonds shall comply with Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code. The board may reject any bid. In the event all proposals are rejected or no proposals are received, or the estimated cost of the work does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board may have the work done by force account without advertising for bids. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050). The board may purchase in the open market without advertising for bids, materials and supplies for use in any
 work, either under contract or by force account. In awarding any contract or authorizing any work, the board shall comply with the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 1770) of Chapter 1 of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 80.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 101. Mariposa County Water Agency [21360. - 21361.]

21360.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Mariposa County Water Agency, as provided for in Chapter 2036 of the Statutes of 1959.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21361.

All contracts for any improvement or unit of work, when the cost according to the estimate of the engineer will exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders as provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit, or divided into severable parts. The board shall advertise for bids by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the agency’s jurisdiction, inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work. The call for bids shall state whether the work shall be performed in one unit or divided into parts. The work may be
 let under a single contract or several contracts, as stated in the call. The board shall require the successful bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material. The bonds shall comply with Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code. The board may reject any bid. In the event all proposals are rejected or no proposals are received, or the estimated cost of the work does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board of supervisors may have the work done by force account without advertising for bids. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050). The district may purchase in the open market without advertising for bids, materials
 and supplies for use in any work, either under contract or by force account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 81.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 102. Sutter County Water Agency [21370. - 21371.]

21370.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Sutter County Water Agency, as provided for in Chapter 2088 of the Statutes of 1959.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21371.

All contracts for any improvement or unit of work, when the cost according to the estimate of the engineer will exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders as provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit, or divided into severable parts. The board shall advertise for bids by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the agency’s jurisdiction, inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work. The call for bids shall state whether the work shall be performed in one unit or divided into parts. The work may be
 let under a single contract or several contracts, as stated in the call. The board shall require the successful bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material. The bonds shall comply with Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code. The board may reject any bid. In the event all proposals are rejected or no proposals are received, or the estimated cost of the work does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or the work consists of emergency work, the board may have the work done by force account without advertising for bids. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050). The district may purchase in the open market without advertising for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work, either under contract
 or by force account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 82.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 103. San Mateo County Flood Control District [21380. - 21381.]

21380.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the San Mateo County Flood Control District, as provided for in Chapter 2108 of the Statutes of 1959.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21381.

All contracts for any improvement or unit of work, except as provided in this article, estimated to cost in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder in the manner provided in this article. The board of supervisors of the district shall advertise by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the district inviting sealed proposals for the construction of the improvement or work before any contract shall be made, and may let by contract separately any part of said work or improvement. The board shall require the successful bidder to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon
 the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material, the bonds to contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code and to be subject to the provisions of that part. The board shall also have the right to reject any bid. In the event all proposals are rejected or no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement, or where the estimated cost of the work does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board of supervisors may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by force account. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050). The district may purchase in the open market without advertising for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work either under contract or by force
 account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 83.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 104. Plumas County Flood Control and Water Conservation District [21390. - 21391.]

21390.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Plumas County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, as provided for in Chapter 2114 of the Statutes of 1959.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21391.

(a) All contracts for the construction of any unit of work, except as provided in this article, estimated to cost in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder in the manner provided in this article. The board shall advertise by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation published in the district, inviting sealed proposals for the construction of the work before any contract shall be made, and may let by contract separately any part of the work. The board shall require the successful bidder to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract
 and upon the payment of all claims for labor and material, the bonds to contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code, and to be subject to the provisions of that title. The board shall also have the right to reject any and all bids, in which case the board may advertise for new bids.

(b) In the event no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement therefor, where the estimated cost of the work does not exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or where the work consists of emergency work necessary in order to protect life and property, the board of directors, by unanimous vote of all members present, may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by force account. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(c) The district may purchase in the open market without advertisement for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work either under contract or by force account; provided, however, that materials and supplies for use in any new construction work or improvement, except work referred to in subdivision (b), may not be purchased if the cost exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), without advertising for bids and awarding the contract to the lowest responsible bidder.

(d) The provisions of this section have no application to a contract entered into with the United States under the authority of Section 3 of Chapter 2114 of the Statutes of 1959, or to a contract authorized by a vote of the electorate of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 84.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 105. Siskiyou County Flood Control and Water Conservation District [21400. - 21401.]

21400.

The provisons of this article shall apply to contracts by the Siskiyou County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, as provided for in Chapter 2121 of the Statutes of 1959.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21401.

(a) All contracts for the construction of any unit of work, except as provided in this article, estimated to cost in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000) shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder in the manner provided in this article. The board shall advertise by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation published in the district inviting sealed proposals for the construction of the work before any contract shall be made, and may let by contract separately any part of the work. The board shall require the successful bidder to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and
 upon the payment of all claims for labor and material, the bonds to contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code, and to be subject to the provisions of that title. The board shall also have the right to reject any bids, in which case the board may advertise for new bids.

(b) In the event no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement, where the estimated cost of the work does not exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or where work consists of emergency work, the board of directors, by unanimous vote of all members present, may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by force account. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(c) The district may purchase in the open market
 without advertisement for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work either under contract or by force account; provided, however, that materials and supplies for use in any new construction work or improvement, except work referred to in subdivision (b), may not be purchased if the cost exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), without advertising for bids and awarding the contract to the lowest responsible bidder.

(d) The provisions of this section have no application to a contract entered into with the United States under the authority of Section 3 of Chapter 2121 of the Statutes of 1959, or to a contract authorized by a vote of the electorate of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 85.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 106. Nevada County Water Agency [21410. - 21411.]

21410.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Nevada County Water Agency, as provided for in Chapter 2122 of the Statutes of 1959.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21411.

All contracts for any improvement or unit of work, when the cost according to the estimate of the engineer will exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders as provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit, or divided into severable parts. The board shall advertise for bids by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the agency’s jurisdiction, inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work. The call for bids shall state whether the work shall be performed in one unit or divided into parts. The work may be
 let under a single contract or several contracts, as stated in the call. The board shall require the successful bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material. The bonds shall comply with Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code. The board may reject any bid. In the event all proposals are rejected or no proposals are received, or the estimated cost of the work does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board may have the work done by force account without advertising for bids. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050). In that event a majority vote of all board members shall be required. The board may purchase in the
 open market, without advertising for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work, either under contract or by force account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 86.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 107. Sierra County Flood Control and Water Conservation District [21420. - 21421.]

21420.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Sierra County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, as provided for in Chapter 2123 of the Statutes of 1959.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21421.

(a) All contracts for the construction of any unit of work, except as provided in this article, estimated to cost in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder in the manner provided in this article. The board shall advertise by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation published in the district inviting sealed proposals for the construction of the work before any contract shall be made, and may let by contract separately any part of the work. The board shall require the successful bidder to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract
 and upon the payment of all claims for labor and material, the bonds to contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code, and to be subject to the provisions of that title. The board shall also have the right to reject any bid, in which case the board may advertise for new bids.

(b) In the event no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement, where the estimated cost of the work does not exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), or where the work consists of emergency work, the board of directors, by unanimous vote of all members present, may, without advertising for bids, have the work done by force account. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(c) The district may purchase in the open
 market without advertisement for bids, materials and supplies for use in any work either under contract or by force account; provided, however, that materials and supplies for use in any new construction work or improvement, except work referred to in subdivision (b), may not be purchased if the cost exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), without advertising for bids and awarding the contract to the lowest responsible bidder.

(d) The provisions of this section have no application to a contract entered into with the United States under the authority of Section 3 of Chapter 2123 of the Statutes of 1959, or to a contract authorized by a vote of the electorate of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 87.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 108. Lassen-Modoc County Flood Control and Water Conservation District [21430. - 21431.]

21430.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Lassen-Modoc County Flood Control and Water Conservation District, as provided for in Chapter 2127 of the Statutes of 1959.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21431.

(a) All contracts for the construction of any unit of work, except as provided in this article, estimated to cost in excess of two thousand dollars ($2,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder in the manner provided in this article. The board shall advertise by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation published in the district inviting sealed proposals for the construction of the work before any contract shall be made, and may let by contract separately any part of the work. The board shall require the successful bidder to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract
 and upon the payment of all claims for labor and material, the bonds to contain the terms and conditions set forth in Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code, and to be subject to the provisions of that title. The board shall also have the right to reject any bid, in which case the board may advertise for new bids.

(b) In the event no proposals are received pursuant to advertisement, where the estimated cost of the work does not exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000), the board of directors, by unanimous vote of all members present, may without advertising for bids, have the work done by force account. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(c) The district may purchase in the open market without advertisement for bids, materials
 and supplies for use in any work either under contract or by force account; provided, however, that materials and supplies for use in any new construction work or improvement, except work referred to in subdivision (b), may not be purchased if the cost exceeds two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), without advertising for bids and awarding the contract to the lowest responsible bidder.

(d) The provisions of this section have no application to a contract entered into with the United States under the authority of Section 3 of Chapter 2127 of the Statutes of 1959, or to a contract authorized by a vote of the electorate of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 88.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 109. Yuba-Bear River Basin Authority [21440. - 21441.]

21440.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Yuba-Bear River Basin Authority, as provided for in Chapter 2131 of the Statutes of 1959.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21441.

(a) All contracts for any improvement or unit of work, when the cost according to the estimate of the engineer will exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders as provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit, or divided into severable parts. The board shall advertise for bids by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the authority, inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement work. The call for bids shall state whether the work shall be performed in one unit or divided into parts. The
 work may be let under a single contract or several contracts, as stated in the call. The board shall require the successful bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material. The bonds shall comply with Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code. The board may reject any bid. In the event all proposals are rejected or no proposals are received, or the estimated cost of the work does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board may have the work done by force account without advertising for bids.

(b) In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050). The authority may
 purchase in the open market without advertising for bids, materials, and supplies for use in any work, either under contract or by force account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 89.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 110. Amador County Water Agency [21450. - 21451.]

21450.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Amador County Water Agency, as provided for in Chapter 2137 of the Statutes of 1959.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21451.

All contracts for any improvement or unit of work, when the cost according to the estimate of the engineer will exceed twelve thousand five hundred dollars ($12,500), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders as provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit or divided into severable parts. The board shall advertise for bids by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the agency, inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work. The call for bids shall state whether the work shall be performed in one unit or divided into parts. The work may be
 let under a single contract or several contracts, as stated in the call. The board shall require the successful bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon the payment of their claims for labor and material. The payment bonds shall comply with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 9550) of Title 3 of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code. The board may reject any bid. If all proposals are rejected or no proposals are received, or the estimated cost of the work does not exceed twelve thousand five hundred dollars ($12,500), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board may have the work done by force account without advertising for bids. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050). The agency may purchase in the open market without advertising for bids,
 materials and supplies for use in any work, either under contract or by force account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 90.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 111. El Dorado County Water Agency [21460. - 21461.]

21460.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the El Dorado County Water Agency, as provided for in Chapter 2139 of the Statutes of 1959.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21461.

All contracts for any improvement or unit of work, when the cost according to the estimate of the engineer will exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), shall be let to the lowest responsible bidder or bidders as provided in this article. The board shall first determine whether the contract shall be let as a single unit, or divided into severable parts. The board shall advertise for bids by three insertions in a daily newspaper of general circulation or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper of general circulation printed and published in the agency, inviting sealed proposals for the construction or performance of the improvement or work. The call for bids shall state whether the work shall be performed in one unit or divided into parts. The work may be let under a
 single contract or several contracts, as stated in such call. The board shall require the successful bidders to file with the board good and sufficient bonds to be approved by the board conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract and upon payment of their claims for labor and material. The bonds shall comply with Title 3 (commencing with Section 9000) of Part 6 of Division 4 of the Civil Code. The board may reject any and all bids. In the event all proposals are rejected or no proposals are received, or the estimated cost of the work does not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), or the work consists of channel protection, maintenance work, or emergency work, the board of supervisors may have the work done by force account without advertising for bids. In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the board shall comply with Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050). The district may purchase in the open market without advertising for bids, materials and
 supplies for use in any work, either under contract or by force account.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 697, Sec. 91.   (SB 189)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative July 1, 2012, by Sec. 105 of Ch. 697.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 112. Mojave Water Agency [21470. - 21472.]

21470.

The provisions of this article shall apply to contracts by the Mojave Water Agency, as provided for in Chapter 2146 of the Statutes of 1959.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1128, Sec. 69.)
-------------------------------------------

21471.

Subject to the limitations in Section 14 of Chapter 166 of the Statutes of 1967, the agency may join with one or more public agencies, private corporations, or other persons for the purpose of carrying out any of the powers of the agency, and for that purpose to contract with the other public agencies, private corporations, or persons for the purpose of financing the acquisitions, constructions, and operations. The contract may provide for contributions to be made by each party to the contract, the division and apportionment of the expenses of acquisitions and operations, and the division and apportionment of the benefits and the services and products therefrom, may provide for any agency to effect the acquisitions and to carry on those operations, and shall provide, in the powers and methods of procedure for the agency, the method by which the agency may contract. The contracts with other public agencies, private corporations, or persons may contain any other and further covenants and agreements that may be necessary or convenient to accomplish the purposes of the contracts. As used in this section, “public agency” shall be deemed to mean and include the United States or any department or agency thereof, the State of California or any department or agency thereof, or a county, city, public corporation, or other public district of this state. As used in this section, “private corporation” shall be deemed to mean and include any private corporation organized under the laws of the United States or of this or any other state. Contracts mentioned in this section include those made with the United States, under the Federal Reclamation Act of June 17, 1902, and all acts amendatory thereof or supplementary thereto, or any other act of Congress heretofore or hereafter enacted permitting cooperation. Any such contract with the United States or any department or agency thereof, or with any private corporation organized under the laws of the United States, by which the Mojave Water Agency, or any improvement district thereof, incurs an indebtedness or liability exceeding in any year the income and revenue for that year shall not be executed without the assent of two-thirds of the qualified electors of the agency, or an improvement district thereof, voting at a special election to be held for that purpose. The special election shall be called and held, so far as practicable, in the same manner as bond elections for the agency. The exact form of the contract need not be available at the time of the special election, but all of the following shall be known and included in the proposition or measure submitted to the qualified electors of the agency, or an improvement district thereof, at the special election:

(a) Purpose of the contract.

(b) Maximum amount of the indebtedness created by the contract.

(c) Maximum term of repayment.

(d) Maximum interest rate on the indebtedness created by the contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 558.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

21472.

In case of an emergency, if notice for bids to let contracts will not be given, the agency shall respond to the emergency pursuant to Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 22050).

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 803, second Sec. 65.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------


